Idaho, session 2025, H0359.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. The Legislature finds that
the State of Idaho has a substantial interest in preserving the integrity of
the electoral process by combating voter confusion. Preventing voter con-
fusion is crucial in facilitating secure elections because it directly im-
pacts voter confidence, voter participation, and the overall integrity of
the electoral process.
The Legislature further finds that the disclosure of party affiliation
in campaign materials furthers the public policy interest of providing addi-
tional information to the voting public. Such party affiliation information
is already required to be indicated on the declaration of candidacy forms for
candidates running in partisan elections. The disclosure of party affilia-
tion in campaign materials is a continuation of disclosure and transparency
requirements already implemented in other areas of the electoral process and
serves the public interest.
The Legislature further finds that clear and accurate communication
concerning persons or entities publishing or distributing political state-
ments in partisan campaigns reduces the burden on election officials by
decreasing the number of voter inquiries and the need for corrective mea-
sures. This efficiency allows officials to focus on maintaining security
protocols and managing the election process effectively.
It is therefore the intent of the Legislature, in order to facilitate
the interests described in this section, that any candidate who makes an
election communication in a partisan campaign discloses the political af-
filiation of such candidate, and if an independent expenditure is made in
support or opposition of a candidate in a partisan race, the political party
for that candidate is disclosed in the election communication.
SECTION 2. That Section 67-6614A, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6614A. PUBLICATION OR DISTRIBUTION OF POLITICAL STATEMENTS -- DIS-
CLOSURE OF PARTY AFFILIATION -- EXCEPTIONS. (1) Whenever any person makes an
expenditure for the purpose of financing communications expressly advocat-
ing the election, approval or defeat of a candidate, measure or person stand-
ing for election to the position of precinct committeeman through any broad-
casting station, newspaper, magazine, outdoor advertising facility, direct
mailing or any other type of general public political advertising, the per-


son responsible for such communication shall be clearly indicated on such
communication.
(2) Every candidate in any partisan election shall disclose the polit-
ical party affiliation of such candidate, if any, in all election communica-
tions made by such candidate, except any election communication included on
stickers or any item designed to be worn by a person. The candidate's party
affiliation disclosure shall be prominently displayed within each election
communication. For the purposes of this section, "party affiliation" means
the written name of the political party such candidate is registered with or
a visual depiction of a commonly recognizable symbol that represents such
political party.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.